Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF711.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.013, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 2a. new text end new text begin Pro rata registration for unused vehicles. new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding section 168.017, a vehicle for which registration under this section has expired and that was not operated on public streets or highways for one or more months following the expiration is subject to a vehicle registration tax calculated as follows: new text end new text begin (1) the registration tax calculated under subdivision 1a; times new text end new text begin (2) 1/12; times new text end new text begin (3) the number of months remaining in the vehicle's 12-month registration period determined under section 168.017. new text end new text begin (b) The owner of a vehicle registered under this subdivision must file with the registrar the verified written application required under section 168.012, subdivision 7, certifying that the vehicle was not operated on public streets or highways during the months following the vehicle's registration expiration. new text end